District of Columbia statutes.
16-4703

Compelled disclosure permitted.

(a)

A court may compel disclosure of news or information otherwise protected from disclosure under section 16-4702(2) if the court finds that the party seeking the news or information established by clear and convincing evidence that:

(1)

The news or information is relevant to a significant legal issue before a judicial, legislative, administrative, or other body that has the power to issue a subpoena;

(2)

The news or information could not, with due diligence, be obtained by any alternative means; and

(3)

There is an overriding public interest in the disclosure.

(b)

A court may not compel disclosure of the source of any information protected under section 16-4702.

History

Sept. 26, 1992, D.C. Law 9-156, § 2, 39 DCR 5682

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4702.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-4703.